Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 4 Optical Scanning Voting Systems

Cross references.

Precincts using optical scanning voting equipment, §

21-2-480

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1, effective January 1, 1999, repealed Code Section

21-2-365

, based on Code 1981, §

21-2-365

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 964, § 2. Section 14 of Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, enacted a Part 4 which was reenacted by § 37 of Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, effective January 1, 1999.

21-2-365.
Requirements for use of optical scanning voting systems.

No optical scanning voting system shall be adopted or used unless it shall, at the time, satisfy the following requirements:

It shall provide facilities for voting for such candidates as may be nominated and upon such questions as may be submitted;

It shall permit each elector, in one operation per ballot, to vote for all the candidates of one party or body for presidential electors;

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this Code section for presidential electors, it shall permit each elector, at other than primaries, to vote a ticket selected from the nominees of any and all parties or bodies, from independent nominations, and from persons not in nomination;

It shall permit each elector to vote, at any election, for any person and for any office for whom and for which he or she is lawfully entitled to vote, whether or not the name of such person or persons appears upon a ballot as a candidate for election; to vote for as many persons for an office as he or she is entitled to vote for; and to vote for or against any question upon which he or she is entitled to vote;

A ballot scanner shall preclude the counting of votes for any candidate or upon any question for whom or upon which an elector is not entitled to vote; shall preclude the counting of votes for more persons for any office than he or she is entitled to vote for; and shall preclude the counting of votes for any candidate for the same office or upon any question more than once;

It shall permit voting in absolute secrecy so that no person can see or know for whom any other elector has voted or is voting, save an elector whom he or she has assisted or is assisting in voting, as prescribed by law;

It shall be constructed of material of good quality in a neat and workmanlike manner;

It shall, when properly operated, record correctly and accurately every vote cast;

It shall be so constructed that an elector may readily learn the method of operating it; and

It shall be safely transportable.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-365

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 19/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “A ballot scanner” for “An optical scanning tabulator” at the beginning of paragraph (5).

Editor’s notes.

Ga L. 1998, p. 1231, § 13, effective April 20, 1998, and Ga. L. 1998, p. 265, § 1, repealed former Code Section

21-2-365

, which was based on Code 1981, §

21-2-365

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 964, § 2, relating to the use of optical scan voting systems.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-366.
Authorization for utilization of optical scanning systems.

The governing authority of any county or municipality may, at any regular meeting or at a special meeting called for the purpose, by a majority vote authorize and direct the use of optical scanning voting systems for recording and computing the vote at elections held in the county or municipality. If so authorized and directed, the governing authority shall purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise procure optical scanning voting systems conforming to the requirements of this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-366

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1.

21-2-367.
Installation of systems; number of systems; good working order.

When the use of optical scanning voting systems has been authorized in the manner prescribed in this part, such optical scanning voting systems shall be installed, either simultaneously or gradually, within the county or municipality.

In each precinct in which optical scanning voting systems are used in a state-wide general election, the county election superintendent shall provide at least one voting booth or enclosure for each 250 electors therein, or fraction thereof.

For any other primary, election, or runoff, the county or municipal election superintendent may provide a greater or lesser number of voting booths or enclosures if, after a thorough consideration of the type of election, expected turnout, the number of electors who have already voted by advance voting or absentee ballot, and other relevant factors that inform the appropriate amount of equipment needed, such superintendent determines that a different amount of equipment is needed or sufficient. Such determination shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 21-2-263.

Reserved.

The county or municipal governing authority, as appropriate, shall provide optical scanning voting systems in good working order and of sufficient capacity to accommodate the names of a reasonable number of candidates for all party offices and nominations and public offices which, under the provisions of existing laws and party rules, are likely to be voted for at any future primary or election.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-367

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 46/HB 244; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 20/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 22/SB 202.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, deleted the second sentence in subsection (a), which read: “Upon the installation of optical scanning voting systems in any precinct, the use of paper ballots or other voting machines or apparatus therein shall be discontinued, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.”; substituted “250 electors” for “200 electors” in subsection (b); and substituted “Reserved” for “Optical scanning voting systems of different kinds may be used for different precincts in the same county or municipality” in subsection (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, designated the existing provisions of subsection (b) as paragraph (b)(1), substituted “used in a state-wide general election, the county election superintendent shall” for “used, the county or municipal governing authority, as appropriate, shall” near the beginning of paragraph (b)(1), and added paragraph (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-368.
Review of manufacturer’s systems by Secretary of State; appointment and compensation of examiners; revocation of approval; written verification and certification prior to election or primary; penalties; conflicts of interest.

Any person or organization owning, manufacturing, or selling, or being interested in the manufacture or sale of, any optical scanning voting system may request the Secretary of State to examine the optical scanning voting system. Any ten or more electors of this state may, at any time, request the Secretary of State to reexamine any optical scanning voting system previously examined and approved by him or her. Before any such examination or reexamination, the person, persons, or organization requesting such examination or reexamination shall pay to the Secretary of State the reasonable expenses of such examination. The Secretary of State may, at any time, in his or her discretion, reexamine any optical scanning voting system.

The Secretary of State shall thereupon examine or reexamine such optical scanning voting system and shall make and file in his or her office a report, attested by his or her signature and the seal of his or her office, stating whether, in his or her opinion, the kind of optical scanning voting system so examined can be safely and accurately used by electors at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter. If this report states that the optical scanning voting system can be so used, the optical scanning voting system shall be deemed approved; and optical scanning voting systems of its kind may be adopted for use at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter.

No kind of optical scanning voting system not so approved shall be used at any primary or election and if, upon the reexamination of any optical scanning voting system previously approved, it shall appear that the optical scanning voting system so reexamined can no longer be safely or accurately used by electors at primaries or elections as provided in this chapter because of any problem concerning its ability to accurately record or tabulate votes, the approval of the same shall immediately be revoked by the Secretary of State; and no such optical scanning voting system shall thereafter be purchased for use or be used in this state.

At least ten days prior to any primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the election superintendent shall verify and certify in writing to the Secretary of State that all voting will occur on equipment certified by the Secretary of State.

Any vendor who completes a sale of optical scanning voting system that has not been certified by the Secretary of State to a governmental body in this state shall be subject to a penalty of $100,000.00, payable to the State of Georgia, plus reimbursement of all costs and expenses incurred by the governmental body in connection with the sale. The State Election Board shall have authority to impose such penalty upon a finding that such a sale has occurred.

When an optical scanning voting system has been so approved, no improvement or change that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity shall render necessary a reexamination or reapproval of the optical scanning voting system, or of its kind.

Neither the Secretary of State, nor any custodian, nor the governing authority of any county or municipality or a member of such authority nor any other person involved in the examination process shall have any pecuniary interest in any optical scanning voting system or in the manufacture or sale thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-368

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 28.

21-2-369.
Printing of ballots; arrangement.

The ballots shall be printed in black ink upon clear, white, or colored material, of such size and arrangement as will suit the construction of the ballot scanner, and in plain, clear type so as to be easily readable by persons with normal vision; provided, however, that red material shall not be used except that all ovals appearing on the ballot to indicate where a voter should mark to cast a vote may be printed in red ink.

The arrangement of offices, names of candidates, and questions upon the ballots shall conform as nearly as practicable to this chapter for the arrangement of same on paper ballots; provided, however, that such form may be varied in order to present a clear presentation of candidates and questions to the electors and that the ballots shall not be required to have a name stub.

The form and arrangement of ballots shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State and prepared by the superintendent.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-369

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 30; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 47/HB 244; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 21/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “ballot scanner” for “optical scanner” near the middle of subsection (a).

21-2-369.1.
Candidates with similar names.

If two or more candidates for the same nomination or office shall have the same or similar names, the Secretary of State, in the case of federal or state offices, the superintendent of elections, in the case of county offices, or the official with whom such candidates qualify, in the case of municipal elections, shall print or cause to be printed the residence of all candidates for such nomination or office on the ballot under their names. The designated official shall determine whether the names of the candidates are of such a similar nature as to warrant printing the residence of all candidates for that office on the ballot; and the decision of the designated official shall be conclusive.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-369.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 29.

21-2-370.
[Reserved] Separate optical scanners for primary elections.

History.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1999.

21-2-371.
Unofficial ballots; out-of-order systems.

If ballots for a precinct at which an optical scanning voting system is to be used shall not be delivered to the poll officers as required by this chapter, the chief manager of such precinct shall cause other ballots to be prepared, printed, or written, as nearly in the form of official ballots as practicable; and the poll officers shall cause the ballots, so substituted, to be used at the primary or election, in the same manner, as nearly as may be, as the official ballots. Such ballots, so substituted, shall be known as unofficial ballots.

If any optical scanning voting system being used in any primary or election shall become out of order during such primary or election, it shall, if possible, be repaired or another optical scanning voting system substituted by the custodian or superintendent as promptly as possible, for which purpose the governing authority of the county or municipality may purchase as many extra optical scanning voting systems as it may deem necessary; but, in case such repair or substitution cannot be made, the ballots may be voted manually.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-371

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1.

21-2-372.
Ballot description.

Ballots shall be of suitable design, size, and stock to permit processing by a ballot scanner and shall be printed in black ink on clear, white, or colored material. Other than ballots delivered electronically to qualified electors who are entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. Section 20301, et seq., the ballots shall be printed on security paper that incorporates features which can be used to authenticate the ballot as an official ballot but which do not make the ballot identifiable to a particular elector.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-372

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 22/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 23/SB 202.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Ballots shall be of suitable design, size, and stock to permit processing by a tabulating machine and shall be printed in black ink on clear, white, or colored material. In counties using a central count tabulating system, a serially numbered strip shall be attached to each ballot in a manner and form similar to that prescribed in this chapter for paper ballots.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-373.
Write-in votes; secrecy.

In elections, electors shall be permitted to cast write-in votes. The design of the ballot shall permit the superintendents, in counting the write-in votes, to determine readily whether an elector has cast any write-in vote not authorized by law. The Secretary of State, in specifying the form of the ballot, and the State Election Board, in promulgating rules and regulations respecting the conduct of elections, shall provide for ballot secrecy in connection with write-in votes.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-373

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1.

Cross references.

Exceptions to right to register and vote, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. I, Para. III.

Procedure for counting write-in votes, §

21-2-437

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

Law reviews.

For note, “Georgia’s Runoff Election System Has Run Its Course,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 1063 (2020).

21-2-374.
Proper programming; proper order; testing; supplies.

The superintendent of each county or municipality shall order the proper programming to be placed in each ballot scanner used in any precinct or central tabulating location.

On or before the third day preceding a primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the superintendent shall have the ballot scanners tested to ascertain that they will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all questions. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be made at least five days prior thereto; provided, however, that, in the case of a runoff, the public notice shall be made at least three days prior thereto. Representatives of political parties and bodies, candidates, news media, and the public shall be permitted to observe such tests. The test shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of ballots so marked as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each question and shall include for each office one or more ballots which are improperly marked and one or more ballots which have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the ballot scanner to reject such votes. The ballot scanner shall not be approved unless it produces an errorless count. If any error is detected, the cause therefor shall be ascertained and corrected; and an errorless count shall be made before the ballot scanner is approved. The superintendent shall cause the pretested ballot scanners to be placed at the various polling places to be used in the primary or election. The superintendent shall require that each ballot scanner be thoroughly tested and inspected prior to each primary and election in which it is used and shall keep such tested material as certification of an errorless count on each ballot scanner. In counties using central count ballot scanners, the same test shall be repeated immediately before the start of the official count of the ballots and at the conclusion of such count. Precinct ballot scanners shall produce a zero tape prior to any ballots being inserted on the day of any primary or election.

In every primary or election, the superintendent shall furnish, at the expense of the county or municipality, all ballots, forms of certificates, and other papers and supplies required under this chapter and which are not furnished by the Secretary of State, all of which shall be in the form and according to the specifications prescribed, from time to time, by the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-374

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 135, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 30; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 48/HB 244; Ga. L. 2007, p. 64, § 1/SB 124; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 23/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “ballot scanner” for “tabulator” in subsection (a) and “ballot scanners” for “tabulators”, “ballot scanner” for “optical scanning tabulator”, and “ballot scanners” for “optical scanning tabulators” throughout subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-375.
Delivery of equipment to polling places; protection for equipment; required accessories.

In counties using precinct count ballot scanners, the superintendent shall deliver the proper ballot scanner to the polling places at least one hour before the time set for opening of the polls at each primary or election and shall cause each to be set up in the proper manner for use in voting.

The superintendent shall provide ample protection against molestation of and injury to the ballot scanner and, for that purpose, shall call upon any law enforcement officer to furnish such assistance as may be necessary; and it shall be the duty of the law enforcement officer to furnish such assistance when so requested by the superintendent.

The superintendent shall at least one hour before the opening of the polls:

Provide sufficient lighting to enable electors, while in the voting booth, to read the ballot, which lighting shall be suitable for the use of poll officers in examining the booth; and such lighting shall be in good working order before the opening of the polls;

Prominently post directions for voting within the voting booth and post within the enclosed space signs reminding electors to verify their ballot choices prior to inserting the scanning ballot into the ballot scanner and stating that sample ballots are available for review upon request; at least two sample ballots in use for the primary or election shall be posted prominently outside the enclosed space within the polling place and additional sample ballots shall be available upon request;

Ensure that the precinct count ballot scanner shall have a seal securing the memory pack in use throughout the election day; such seal shall not be broken unless the ballot scanner is replaced due to malfunction; and

Provide such other materials and supplies as may be necessary or as may be required by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-375

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 24/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “ballot scanner” for “optical scanning tabulator” and “ballot scanners” for “optical scanning tabulators” throughout this Code section; in paragraph (c)(2), deleted “on the optical scanning ballot” following “directions for voting” near the beginning, inserted “and post within the enclosed space signs reminding electors to verify their ballot choices prior to inserting the scanning ballot into the ballot scanner and stating that sample ballots are available for review upon request” near the middle, and inserted “and additional sample ballots shall be available upon request” at the end; and substituted “ballot scanner” for “tabulator” near the end of paragraph (c)(3).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-376.
Demonstration of equipment.

During the 30 days next preceding a general primary or election or during the ten days next preceding a special primary or election, the superintendent shall place on public exhibition, in such public places and at such times as he or she may deem most suitable for the information and instruction of the electors, one or more sets of sample ballots that will be used in such election. The sample ballots shall show the offices and questions to be voted upon, the names and arrangements of parties and bodies, and the names and arrangements of the candidates to be voted for. Such ballots shall be under the charge and care of a person competent as an instructor.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-376

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

21-2-377.
Custody and storage when not in use.

The superintendent shall designate a person or persons who shall have custody of the ballot scanners of the county or municipality when they are not in use at a primary or election and shall provide for his or her compensation and for the safe storage and care of the ballot scanners.

All ballot scanners, when not in use, shall be properly covered and stored in a suitable place or places.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-377

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 25/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “ballot scanners” for “optical scanning tabulators” throughout this Code section.

21-2-378.
Payment for systems.

The governing authority of any county or municipality which adopts optical scanning voting systems in the manner provided for by this part shall, upon the purchase of optical scanning voting systems, provide for their payment by the county or municipality. Bonds or other evidence of indebtedness may be issued in accordance with the provisions of law relating to the increase of indebtedness of counties or municipalities to meet all or any part of the cost of the optical scanning voting systems.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-378

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1.